verb/verb-irr.lexc
LEXICON VAIR
vair+Verb+PresInd+1P+Sg:ves		PronSg1 ;
vair+Verb+PresInd+2P+Sg:vesas		# ;
vair+Verb+PresInd+3P+Sg:vesa		PronSg3Short ;
vair+Verb+PresInd+1P+Pl:vesain	PronPl1 ;
vair+Verb+PresInd+2P+Pl:vesais	# ;
vair+Verb+PresInd+3P+Pl:vesan		PronPl3 ;
vair:vese					ImpIndEnd ;
vair:vesi					ConjEnd ;
vair:vese					CondEnd ;
vair:vese					GerundEnd ;
vair						InfEnd ;

LEXICON VESAIR
vesair+Verb+PresInd+1P+Sg:ves		PronSg1 ;
vesair+Verb+PresInd+2P+Sg:vesas		# ;
vesair+Verb+PresInd+3P+Sg:vesa		PronSg3Short ;
vesair+Verb+PresInd+1P+Pl:vesain	PronPl1 ;
vesair+Verb+PresInd+2P+Pl:vesais	# ;
vesair+Verb+PresInd+3P+Pl:vesan		PronPl3 ;
vesair:vese					ImpIndEnd ;
vesair:vesi					ConjEnd ;
vesair:vese					CondEnd ;
vesair:vese					GerundEnd ;
vesair						InfEnd ;


LEXICON VEGNIR
vegnir+Verb+PresInd+1P+Sg:vegn		PronSg1 ;
vegnir+Verb+PresInd+2P+Sg:vegns		# ;
vegnir+Verb+PresInd+3P+Sg:vegn		PronSg3Cons ;
vegnir+Verb+PresInd+1P+Pl:vegnin	PronPl1 ;
vegnir+Verb+PresInd+2P+Pl:vegnis	# ;
vegnir+Verb+PresInd+3P+Pl:vegnan	PronPl3 ;
vegnir:vegni					ImpIndEnd ;
vegnir:vegni					ConjEnd ;
vegnir:vegni					CondEnd ;
vegnir:vegni					GerundEnd ;
vegnir							InfEnd ;
vegnir+Verb+Impv+2P+Sg:ve		# ;
vegnir+Verb+Impv+2P+Pl:vegni	# ;


LEXICON VULAIR
vulair+Verb+PresInd+1P+Sg:vi		PronSg1 ;
vulair+Verb+PresInd+2P+Sg:vuls		# ;
vulair+Verb+PresInd+3P+Sg:vul		PronSg3Cons ;
vulair+Verb+PresInd+1P+Pl:vulain	PronPl1 ;
vulair+Verb+PresInd+2P+Pl:vulais	# ;
vulair+Verb+PresInd+3P+Pl:vulan		PronPl3 ;
vulair:vule						ImpIndEnd ;
vulair:vegli					ConjEnd ;
vulair:vule						CondEnd ;
vulair:vule						GerundEnd ;
vulair							InfEnd ;
vulair+Verb+Impv+2P+Sg:veglias	# ;
vulair+Verb+Impv+2P+Pl:veglias	# ;
! Short Forms:
vulair+Verb+PresInd+1P+Pl:lain	PronPl1 ;
vulair+Verb+ImpInd+1P+Sg:leva	# ;
vulair+Verb+Cond+1P+Sg:less		PronSg1 ;



! Endings:
!=========
! Imperfect Indicative:
LEXICON ImpIndEnd
+Verb+ImpInd+1P+Sg:va	# ;
+Verb+ImpInd+2P+Sg:vas	# ;
+Verb+ImpInd+3P+Sg:va	# ;
+Verb+ImpInd+1P+Pl:van	# ;
+Verb+ImpInd+2P+Pl:vas	# ;
+Verb+ImpInd+3P+Pl:van	# ;
!! Suffigated Forms:
+Verb+ImpInd+3P+Sg+Apo:v'	# ;
+Verb+ImpInd+3P+Sg^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+Masc+Sg:va'l	# ;
+Verb+ImpInd+3P+Sg^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+Fem+Sg:v'la	# ;
+Verb+ImpInd+3P+Sg^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+MF+Sg:vi		# ;
+Verb+ImpInd+1P+Pl^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+1P+MF+Pl:vansa	# ;
+Verb+ImpInd+3P+Pl^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+MF+Pl:vani		# ;


! Conjunctive:
LEXICON ConjEnd
+Verb+Con+1P+Sg:a	# ;
+Verb+Con+2P+Sg:as	# ;
+Verb+Con+3P+Sg:a	# ;
+Verb+Con+1P+Pl:an	# ;
+Verb+Con+2P+Pl:as	# ;
+Verb+Con+3P+Pl:an	# ;
!! Suffigated Forms:
+Verb+Con+3P+Sg+Apo:an	# ;
+Verb+Con+1P+Pl^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+1P+MF+Pl:ansa	#;
+Verb+Con+3P+Pl^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+MF+Pl:ani	#;


! Conditional
LEXICON CondEnd
+Verb+Cond+1P+Sg:ss		# ;
+Verb+Cond+2P+Sg:ssas	# ;
+Verb+Cond+3P+Sg:ss		# ;
+Verb+Cond+1P+Pl:ssan	# ;
+Verb+Cond+2P+Pl:ssas	# ;
+Verb+Cond+3P+Pl:ssan	# ;
!! Suffigated Forms:
+Verb+Cond+1P+Sg^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+1P+MF+Sg:ssa	#;
+Verb+Cond+3P+Sg^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+MF+Sg:ssi	#;
+Verb+Cond+1P+Pl^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+1P+MF+Pl:ssansa	#;
+Verb+Cond+3P+Pl^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+MF+Pl:ssani	#;


! Gerund
LEXICON GerundEnd
+Verb+Gerund:nd	# ;


! Infinitive
LEXICON InfEnd
+Verb+Inf:0	# ;



! Suffigated Pronouns:
!=====================
LEXICON PronSg1
^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+1P+MF+Sg:a	#;
#;

LEXICON PronSg3
^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+1P+Masc+Sg:a'l	#;
^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+1P+Fem+Sg:'la	#;
^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+1P+MF+Sg:i		#;
+Apo:'	#;
#;

LEXICON PronSg3Short
^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+1P+Masc+Sg:'l	#;
^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+1P+Fem+Sg:'la	#;
^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+1P+MF+Sg:*DOUBi		#;
+Apo:n	#;
#;

LEXICON PronSg3Cons
^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+1P+MF+Sg:i	#;
#;

LEXICON PronPl1
^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+1P+MF+Pl:sa	#;
#;

LEXICON PronPl3
^|+Pron+Pers+Nom+3P+MF+Pl:i	#;
#;
